Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska30-2418
Informal probate; registrar not satisfied.

If the registrar is not satisfied that a will is entitled to be probated in informal proceedings because of failure to meet the requirements of sections 30-2416 and 30-2417 or any other reason, he may decline the application. A declination of informal probate is not an adjudication and does not preclude formal probate proceedings.

Laws 1974, LB 354, § 96, UPC § 3-305.